New York, session 2025-2026, A10825.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subsection (bbb) to read as follows: 3 (bbb) Commuter tolls credit. (1) General. Each individual qualified 4 taxpayer shall be allowed a credit not to exceed one thousand dollars 5 during any taxable year, to be computed as provided in this subsection, 6 against the tax imposed by this article for qualified tolls paid during 7 such taxable year. 8 (2) Definitions. (A) The term "qualified taxpayer" means a resident 9 taxpayer who commutes to and from their place of employment and who 10 during the course of such commuting pays qualified tolls not less than 11 three times each week for not less than forty-five weeks during the 12 taxable year. 13 (B) The term "qualified tolls" means tolls and fees imposed for use of 14 a public highway or bridge within the state, or tolls and fees imposed 15 by a public authority, established by the laws of this state, for the 16 use of a public highway or bridge; and such tolls or fees were paid 17 while a qualified taxpayer was in the course of commuting to and from 18 their place of employment. 19 (3) Amount of credit. The amount of the credit pursuant to this 20 subsection shall be the first one thousand dollars of qualified tolls 21 paid by an individual qualified taxpayer during the taxable year, except 22 in the case where two qualified taxpayers file jointly, the amount of 23 such credit shall be the first two thousand dollars of the qualified 24 tolls paid by such qualified taxpayers during the taxable year as 25 computed by adding the tax credits each would be allowed pursuant to 26 this subsection if they each filed individually. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14718-01-6 A. 10825 2 1 (4) Disputes. If the qualified taxpayer formally challenges any fine, 2 fee, or administrative charge, all such charges that could otherwise be 3 imposed, or continue to be imposed, post-challenge, as well as monies 4 arising from the commuter tolls credit, shall be frozen in the midst of 5 such dispute until the dispute reaches a resolution. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to the 7 taxable year in which it takes effect and taxable years commencing ther- 8 eafter.